Hawaii statutes.
§291-56
Rules. The disability and
communication access board shall adopt rules under chapter 91 to carry out the
purposes of this part, including rules for:

(1) The issuance, renewal, confiscation, revocation,
and suspension of removable windshield placards, temporary removable windshield
placards, and special license plates;

(2) Decertification, reciprocity, and the replacement
of placards and identification cards;

(3) The design of the placard, identification card,
and special license plates;

(4) The establishment of transaction fees for
placards;

(5) Signage and marking of parking spaces;

(6) Reimbursement rates to the counties; and

(7) Penalties. [L
1984, c 46, pt of §2; am L 1992, c 46, §8; am L 1997, c 308, §12; am L 1999, c
282, §7; am L 2001, c 297, §10; am L 2003, c 30, §9; am L 2006, c 269, §5; am L
2010, c 141, §8]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next